japanese/Japanese.lexc
Multichar_Symbols +V -PST +PST +PASS +CAUS +NEG

LEXICON Root
Verb ;

LEXICON Verb
eat:tabe Vinf;
open:ake Vinf;

LEXICON Vinf
+V+PST:^ta #;
+V+CAUS+PST:^saseta #;
+V+PASS+PST:^rareta #;
+V+CAUS+PASS+PST:^saserareta #;
+V+CAUS+Neg:^sasenai #;
+V+NEG:^nai #;
+V+CAUS+PASS-PST:^saserareru #;
